Oklahoma, session 2026, SB7.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

Req. No. 192 Page 1


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-305 of Title 70, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. 1. There is hereby created the Oklahoma Teacher Recruitment


Academy to be administered by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher


Education to provide tuition and mandatory fee assistance to


individuals to earn a bachelor’s degree from a teacher preparation


program accredited by the Commission for Educational Quality and


Accountability if the individuals commit to teach in one of the


critical shortage subject areas identified pursuant to paragraph 2


of this subsection in a public school in this state.


2. For the purposes of this section, “critical shortage subject


area” means a subject area identified by the State Department of


Education that is in critical need of certified teachers. By July


30, 2025, and by July 30 every three (3) years thereafter, the State


Department of Education shall identify and publish on its website a


list of the top five critical shortage subject areas taking into


consideration the results of the educator supply-and-demand study


conducted pursuant to Section 6-211 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma


Statutes. The eligibility of an individual who has executed an


agreement pursuant to subsection C of this section shall not be


affected by the removal of a subject area from the Department’s list


of top five critical shortage subject areas.



Req. No. 192 Page 2


B. To be eligible to participate in the Oklahoma Teacher


Recruitment Academy during the 2025-2026 academic year and


thereafter, an individual shall:


1. Enroll in an institution of higher education within The


Oklahoma State System of Higher Education. An individual may enroll


first in a two-year institution and subsequently transfer to a four-


year institution to complete the requirements for a degree from an


approved teacher preparation program;


2. Submit an application on a form prescribed by the Oklahoma


State Regents for Higher Education; and


3. Execute an agreement pursuant to subsection C of this


section.


C. An individual who meets the eligibility criteria set forth


in subsection B of this section shall execute an agreement stating


that he or she shall:


1. Agree to earn a bachelor’s degree from an approved teacher


preparation degree program leading to a standard teaching


certificate;


2. Agree to meet the requirements of Section 6-187 of Title 70


of the Oklahoma Statutes to earn a standard teaching certificate in


a critical shortage subject area identified pursuant to subsection A


of this section; and


3. Agree to teach in a public school in this state in a


critical shortage subject area identified pursuant to subsection A

Req. No. 192 Page 3


of this section. The individual shall be required to teach for one


school year in a public school for each academic year the individual


received tuition and mandatory fee assistance pursuant to this


section.


D. 1. Subject to the availability of funding, the amount of


assistance shall be equivalent to the amount of tuition and


mandatory fees for courses in which the individual enrolls for


completion of a bachelor’s degree. Assistance shall not be allowed


for courses or other postsecondary units taken in excess of the


requirements for completion of a bachelor’s degree or taken more


than five (5) years after the individual’s first semester of


enrollment in an institution of higher education within The Oklahoma


State System of Higher Education.


2. The amount of assistance provided to eligible students shall


not exceed Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00) for the 2025-2026


academic year and every academic year thereafter. Assistance shall


be provided on a first-come, first-served basis and shall be granted


without any limitation other than the amount of funds available for


the Oklahoma Teacher Recruitment Academy and the number of eligible


students who apply. The State Regents may, at the time assistance


is provided on behalf of an eligible student, set aside funds in the


Oklahoma Teacher Recruitment Academy Revolving Fund created pursuant


to Section 2 of this act for the full commitment made to the


eligible student.

Req. No. 192 Page 4


3. Assistance provided pursuant to this subsection shall be


allocated to the institution of higher education from the Oklahoma


Teacher Recruitment Academy Revolving Fund created pursuant to


Section 2 of this act.


4. An eligible student seeking tuition and fee assistance


pursuant to this section who is eligible for federal education


benefits or Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Act benefits shall


exhaust all such available benefits first.


E. To retain eligibility for the Oklahoma Teacher Recruitment


Academy, an individual shall:


1. Maintain good academic standing and satisfactory academic


progress while enrolled in an institution of higher education


according to the institution’s standards; and


2. After earning a bachelor’s degree, submit annual proof of


employment with a public school in this state teaching in a critical


shortage subject area identified pursuant to subsection A of this


section. The proof shall be provided for a number of school years


equal to the number of academic years for which the individual


received tuition and mandatory fee assistance pursuant to this


section. The individual shall not be required to teach at the same


school for the number of school years required by this paragraph.


F. An individual who has received Oklahoma Teacher Recruitment


Academy assistance pursuant to this section and who fails to comply



Req. No. 192 Page 5


with the agreement executed pursuant to subsection C of this section


shall be required to repay an amount to be calculated as follows:


1. Determine the total amount of assistance provided pursuant


to the provisions of this section;


2. Divide the amount determined in paragraph 1 of this


subsection by the number of months assistance was provided; and


3. Multiply the amount determined in paragraph 2 of this


subsection by the number of months the individual did not fulfill


the requirements of the agreement executed pursuant to subsection C


of this section. Repayments shall be deposited into the Oklahoma


Teacher Recruitment Academy Revolving Fund created pursuant to


Section 2 of this act.


G. An individual who has received Oklahoma Teacher Recruitment


Academy assistance pursuant to this section and who fails to comply


with the agreement executed pursuant to subsection C of this section


due to hardship circumstances may request a waiver from repayment


from the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education.


H. An institution of higher education within The Oklahoma State


System of Higher Education that has enrolled students participating


in the Oklahoma Teacher Recruitment Academy shall develop and


promote, in coordination with surrounding public school districts, a


public awareness program to make students and their parents or legal


guardians aware of the Oklahoma Teacher Recruitment Academy.



Req. No. 192 Page 6


I. On or before July 30, 2026, and each year thereafter, the


Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education shall electronically


submit a report to the Governor, the President Pro Tempore of the


Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the chairs


of the committees with responsibility over higher education in both


houses of the Legislature. The report shall include the following


information:


1. The number of Oklahoma Teacher Recruitment Academy


participants enrolled in each institution of higher education by


year of enrollment;


2. The number of Oklahoma Teacher Recruitment Academy


participants who graduate with a bachelor’s degree from an approved


teacher preparation program and the critical shortage subject area


in which they are teaching in a public school in this state; and


3. The number of Oklahoma Teacher Recruitment Academy


participants who fail to comply with the agreement executed pursuant


to subsection C of this section.


J. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education may


promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this section.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-306 of Title 70, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund


for the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education to be designated

Req. No. 192 Page 7


the “Oklahoma Teacher Recruitment Academy Revolving Fund”. The fund


shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations,


and shall consist of all monies received by the State Regents from


legislative appropriations provided for the purpose of implementing


the Oklahoma Teacher Recruitment Academy created in Section 1 of


this act. All monies accruing to the credit of the fund are hereby


appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the State Regents


for the purpose provided for in this act. Expenditures from the


fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer


against claims filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the


Office of Management and Enterprise Services for approval and


payment.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-192 EB 1/19/2025 5:41:36 AM











Req. No. 192 Page 8